Utah statutes.
10-3-820.   Bonds of officers in cities of the first and second class.

In cities of the first and second class, the mayor and each council member shall give a penal bond, with approved corporate surety, in the amount of not less than $10,000 and the auditor shall give a penal bond with approved corporate surety in the sum of not less than $20,000 conditioned for the faithful performance of the duties of their offices and payment of all money received by them according to law and the ordinances of the city.

